espanol_verbo.foma
read lexc espanol_verbo.lexc

define Lexicon;

define PresIndYo1 [a r "^"] -> o || _ 1;
define PresIndTu1 [a r "^"] -> as || _ 2;
define PresIndElla1 [a r "^"] -> a || _ 3;
define PresIndNos1 [a r "^"] -> amos || _ 4;
define PresIndVos1 [a r "^"] -> áis || _ 5;
define PresIndUst1 [a r "^"] -> an || _ 6;

define PresIndYo2 [e r "^"] -> o || _ 1;
define PresIndTu2 [e r "^"] -> es || _ 2;
define PresIndElla2 [e r "^"] -> e || _ 3;
define PresIndNos2 [e r "^"] -> emos || _ 4;
define PresIndVos2 [e r "^"] -> éis || _ 5;
define PresIndUst2 [e r "^"] -> en || _ 6;

define PresIndYo3 [i r "^"] -> o || _ 1;
define PresIndTu3 [i r "^"] -> es || _ 2;
define PresIndElla3 [i r "^"] -> e || _ 3;
define PresIndNos3 [i r "^"] -> imos || _ 4;
define PresIndVos3 [i r "^"] -> ís || _ 5;
define PresIndUst3 [i r "^"] -> en || _ 6;

define PresInd1 PresIndYo1 .o. PresIndTu1 .o. PresIndElla1 .o. PresIndNos1 .o. PresIndVos1 .o. PresIndUst1;
define PresInd2 PresIndYo2 .o. PresIndTu2 .o. PresIndElla2 .o. PresIndNos2 .o. PresIndVos2 .o. PresIndUst2;
define PresInd3 PresIndYo3 .o. PresIndTu3 .o. PresIndElla3 .o. PresIndNos3 .o. PresIndVos3 .o. PresIndUst3;

define PresInd PresInd1 .o. PresInd2 .o. PresInd3;

define HatDelete "^" -> 0;

define Digits [0 | 1 |  2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6];

define DigitsDelete Digits -> 0;

define FullVerboGrammar Lexicon .o. PresInd .o. HatDelete;

regex    Lexicon
     .o. PresInd
     .o. DigitsDelete
     .o. HatDelete;

save stack NormalVerbo.bin

quit;
